Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2226
Terms, defined.

The words found in Chapter 25 shall be construed and held to mean as follows: Complainant means plaintiff; bill means complaint; suit means action or civil action; and decree means judgment; and all other words and terms found in Chapter 25, heretofore applicable to the chancery practice hereby repealed, shall be so construed and held as to carry out the intention of such chapter, prevent a failure of justice, and give adequate relief in all cases.

Laws 1867, § 5, p. 71;

R.S.1913, § 8575;

C.S.1922, § 9526;

C.S.1929, § 20-2227;

R.S.1943, § 25-2226;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 56.

A judgment and a decree are synonymous terms. Spencer v. Spencer, 165 Neb. 675, 87 N.W.2d 212 (1957).

Decree of divorce is judgment. Wharton v. Jackson, 107 Neb. 288, 185 N.W. 428 (1921).